Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB591.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Title 74 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a chapter to read:CHAPTER 97INSTALLATION OF DRY HYDRANTSSec.9701. Definitions.9702. Dry hydrant installation required.§ 9701. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this chapter shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Bridge." A State-owned, new or existing bridge under the jurisdiction of the department."Department." The Department of Transportation of the 12345678910111213141516171819 Commonwealth."Historic resource." A building or structure, including a covered bridge, which:(1) has been in existence for more than 100 years, including partial or complete reconstruction of a building or structure originally erected at least 100 years ago; or(2) has been listed on the National Register of Historic Places or the Pennsylvania Register of Historic Places."Occupied structure." Any structure, vehicle or place adapted for overnight accommodation of an individual or for carrying on business within the structure, vehicle or place, whether or not an individual is actually present.§ 9702. Dry hydrant installation required.(a) Requirement.--If a bridge that crosses a body of water is built, modified or rehabilitated, the department shall install a dry hydrant if an installation site exists that meets all of the conditions specified under subsection (b) . (b) Conditions.--The requirement imposed on the department under subsection (a) shall only apply if all of the following conditions are met:(1) The body of water in which the dry hydrant will be installed is able to provide 250 gallons per minute for a continuous two-hour period during a 50-year drought or freeze at a vertical lift of 18 feet.(2) The dry hydrant will be located within 25 feet of an all-weather roadway and will be accessible to fire protection equipment.(3) The dry hydrant will be located within 800 feet of at least one inhabited, occupied structure or historical resource.20250SB0591PN0599 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (4) The installation of the dry hydrant would improve the fire prevention or fire suppression capabilities of the community as determined by the Fire Suppression Rating Schedule or a similar criteria on the effective date of this paragraph.(c) Multiple locations.--If there are multiple locations that meet all of the conditions specified under subsection (b) , the department shall install the dry hydrant at the location which is closest to the roadway.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250SB0591PN0599 - 3 - 12345678910